West Virginia, session 2025, HB2816.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. COMMON LAW. §2-1-3. Secondary sources not controlling. (a) A secondary source, including a legal treatise, scholarly publication, textbook, or other explanatory text, does not constitute the law or public policy of this state and is only persuasive authority to the extent its adoption would create, eliminate, expand, or restrict a cause of action, right, or remedy, or to the extent it is inconsistent with, or in conflict with, or otherwise not addressed by, West Virginia law.(b) On a legal issue of first impression regarding the creation, elimination, expansion, or restriction of a cause of action, right, or remedy, the circuit court may certify its question of law to the Supreme Court of Appeals of West Virginia.